Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Executive Agency Lobbying

11A.201.
Definitions for KRS 11A.201 to 11A.246 and KRS 11A.990.

As used in KRS

11A.201

to

11A.246

and KRS

11A.990

:

“Compensation” means any money, thing of value, or economic benefit conferred on, or received by, any person in return for services rendered, or to be rendered, by himself or another;

“Expenditure” means any of the following that is made to, or for the benefit of an elected executive official, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, an executive agency official, or a member of the staff of any of the officials listed in this paragraph:

A payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, reimbursement, or gift of money, real estate, or anything of value, including, but not limited to, food and beverages, entertainment, lodging, transportation, or honoraria;

A contract, promise, or agreement to make an expenditure; or

The purchase, sale, or gift of services or any other thing of value.

“Expenditure” does not include a contribution, gift, or grant to a foundation or other charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. “Expenditure” does not include the purchase, sale, or gift of services or any other thing of value that is available to the general public on the same terms as it is available to the persons listed in this subsection. “Expenditure” does not include a payment, contribution, gift, purchase, or any other thing of value that is made to or on behalf of any elected executive official, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, an executive agency official, or any member of the staff of any of the officials listed in this paragraph who works for a state agency for which the executive agency lobbyist is not registered to influence;

“Employer” means any person who engages an executive agency lobbyist;

“Engage” means to make any arrangement, and “engagement” means arrangement, whereby an individual is employed or retained for compensation to act for or on behalf of an employer to influence executive agency decisions or to conduct any executive agency lobbying activity;

“Financial impact” means to have an effect on the financial position of the employer of the executive agency lobbyist or the real party in interest whether or not the impact is positive or negative;

“Financial transaction” means a transaction or activity that is conducted or undertaken for profit and arises from the joint ownership, or the ownership, or part ownership in common of any real or personal property or any commercial or business enterprise of whatever form or nature between the following:

An executive agency lobbyist, his or her employer, a real party in interest, or a member of the immediate family of the executive agency lobbyist, his or her employer, or a real party in interest; and

Any elected executive official, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, an executive agency official, or any member of the staff of any of the officials listed in this subparagraph.

“Financial transaction” does not include any transaction or activity described in paragraph (a) of this subsection if it is available to the general public on the same terms;

“Executive agency” means the office of an elected executive official, a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, or any other state agency, department, board, or commission controlled or directed by an elected executive official or otherwise subject to his or her authority. “Executive agency” does not include any court or the General Assembly;

“Executive agency decision” means a decision of an executive agency regarding the expenditure of funds of the state or of an executive agency with respect to the award of a contract, grant, lease, or other financial arrangement under which those funds are distributed or allocated. This shall also include decisions made concerning:

The parameters of requests for information, requests for proposals, and other forms of solicitation in KRS Chapter 45A or 176;

Drafting, adopting, or implementing a budget provision;

Administrative regulations or rules;

An executive order; or

Legislation or amendments thereto;

“Executive agency lobbyist” means any person engaged to influence executive agency decisions or to conduct executive agency lobbying activity as one (1) of his or her main purposes regarding a substantial issue, including associations, coalitions, or public interest entities formed for the purpose of promoting or otherwise influencing executive agency decisions. The term “executive agency lobbyist” shall also include placement agents and unregulated placement agents.

“Executive agency lobbyist” does not include an elected or appointed officer or employee of a federal or state agency, state college, state university, or political subdivision who attempts to influence or affect executive agency decisions in his or her fiduciary capacity as a representative of his or her agency, college, university, or political subdivision;

“Executive agency lobbying activity” means contacts made to promote, advocate, or oppose the passage, modification, defeat, or executive approval or veto of any legislation or otherwise influence the outcome of an executive agency decision by direct communication with an elected executive official, the secretary of any cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, any executive agency official whether in the classified service or not, or a member of the staff of any one (1) of the officials listed in this paragraph.

“Executive agency lobbying activity” does not include any of the following:

The action of any person having a direct interest in executive agency decisions, if the person acting under Section 1 of the Kentucky Constitution, assembles together with other persons for their common good, petitions any person listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection for the redress of grievances or other proper purposes;

Contacts made for the sole purpose of gathering information contained in a public record;

Appearances before public meetings of executive agencies;

News, editorial, and advertising statements published in newspapers, journals, or magazines, or broadcast over radio or television;

The gathering and furnishing of information and news by bona fide reporters, correspondents, or news bureaus to news media described in subparagraph 4. of this paragraph;

Publications primarily designed for, and distributed to, members of bona fide associations or charitable or fraternal nonprofit corporations;

Professional services in preparing executive agency decisions, preparing arguments regarding executive agency decisions, or in advising clients and rendering opinions regarding proposed or pending executive agency decisions, if the services are not otherwise connected to lobbying; or

Public comments submitted to an executive agency during the public comment period on administrative regulations or rules;

“Executive agency official” means an officer or employee of an executive agency whose principal duties are to formulate policy or to participate directly or indirectly in the preparation, review, or award of contracts, grants, leases, or other financial arrangements with an executive agency;

“Aggrieved party” means a party entitled to resort to a remedy;

“Elected executive official” means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, Attorney General, and Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Person” means an individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, joint stock company, syndicate, business or statutory trust, donative trust, estate, company, corporation, limited liability company, association, club, committee, organization, or group of persons acting in concert;

“Staff” means any employee of the office of the Governor, or a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, whose official duties are to formulate policy and who exercises administrative or supervisory authority, or who authorizes the expenditure of state funds;

“Real party in interest” means the person or entity on whose behalf an executive agency lobbyist is acting, if that person or entity is not the employer of the executive agency lobbyist;

“Substantial issue” means contacts which are intended to influence a decision that involves one or more disbursements of state funds in an amount of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year, or any budget provision, administrative regulation or rule, or legislative matter that financially impacts the executive agency lobbyist or his or her employer;

“Placement agent” means an individual or firm who is compensated or hired by an employer or other real party in interest for the purpose of influencing an executive agency decision regarding the investment of the Kentucky Retirement Systems, the County Employees Retirement System, or the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System assets; and

“Unregulated placement agent” means a placement agent who is prohibited by federal securities laws and regulations promulgated thereunder from receiving compensation for soliciting a government agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 45, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 172, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 417, § 6, effective December 1, 2000; 2012, ch. 75, § 2, effective April 11, 2012; 2013, ch. 106, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 74, § 5, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 127, § 8, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 79, § 12, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/1/2021). This statute was amended by
2020 Ky. Acts chs. 79 and
127, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(12/1/2000). The contingency on the effectiveness of this statute set by
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 417, sec. 18, was met, the voters of the Commonwealth having ratified at the general election on November 7, 2000, a constitutional amendment (see
2000 Ky. Acts ch. 399) abolishing the Railroad Commission.

11A.206.
Requirements for executive agency lobbyists, their employers, and real parties in interest.

An executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest shall not knowingly fail to register as required under KRS

11A.211

.

An executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest shall not knowingly fail to keep a receipt or maintain a record that KRS

11A.216

requires the person to keep or maintain.

An executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest shall not knowingly fail to file a statement that KRS

11A.216

requires the person to file.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 46, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 172, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

11A.211.
Registration statements for executive agency lobbyists, their employers, and real parties in interest — Fee — Trust and agency account for commission operations — Relationship of registration to state contracts.

Each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest shall file with the commission within ten (10) days following the engagement of an executive agency lobbyist, an initial registration statement showing all of the following:

The name, business address, and occupation of the executive agency lobbyist;

The name and business address of the employer and of any real party in interest on whose behalf the executive agency lobbyist is acting, if it is different from the employer. However, if a trade association or other charitable or fraternal organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code is the employer, the statement need not list the names and addresses of every member of the association or organization, so long as the association or organization itself is listed;

A brief description of the executive agency decision to which the engagement relates;

The name of the executive agency or agencies to which the engagement relates;

Certification by the employer and executive agency lobbyist that the information contained in the registration statement is complete and accurate;

Compensation paid to, or received by, each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest as part of the engagement; and

Certification that the employer and agent have complied with KRS

11A.236

.

In addition to the initial registration statement required by subsection (1) of this section, each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest shall file with the commission, not later than the last day of July of each year, an updated registration statement that confirms the continuing existence of each engagement described in an initial registration statement, that lists the specific executive agency decisions the executive agency lobbyist sought to influence under the engagement during the period covered by the updated statement, and the compensation paid to, or received by, each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest as part of the engagement, and with it any statement of expenditures required to be filed by KRS

11A.216

and any details of financial transaction required to be filed by KRS

11A.221

.

Compensation paid under subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be reported after it is received by, or paid to, each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest as determined by the terms of the engagement, and shall be listed by the amount paid or received, the intervals on which the payment is paid or received, and shall include any other compensation received or paid as part of the engagement.

If an executive agency lobbyist is engaged by more than one (1) employer, the executive agency lobbyist shall file a separate initial and updated registration statement for each engagement and list compensation paid to, or received by each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest as part of the engagement. If an employer engages more than one (1) executive agency lobbyist, the employer shall file only one (1) updated registration statement under subsection (2) of this section, which shall contain the information required by subsection (2) of this section regarding all executive agency lobbyists engaged by the employer.

A change in any information required by subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (2) of this section shall be reflected in the next updated registration statement filed under subsection (2) of this section.

Within thirty (30) days following the termination of an engagement, the executive agency lobbyist who was employed under the engagement shall file written notice of the termination with the commission.

Each employer of one (1) or more executive agency lobbyists, and each real party in interest, shall pay a registration fee of five hundred dollars ($500) upon the filing of an updated registration statement. All fees collected by the commission under the provisions of this subsection shall be deposited in the State Treasury in a trust and agency fund account to the credit of the commission. These agency funds shall be used to supplement general fund appropriations for the operations of the commission and shall not lapse. No part of the trust and agency fund account shall revert to the general funds of this state.

Upon registration pursuant to this section, an executive agency lobbyist shall be issued a card annually by the commission showing the executive agency lobbyist is registered. The registration card shall be valid from the date of its issuance through the thirty-first day of July of the following year.

The commission shall review each registration statement filed with the commission under this section to determine if the statement contains all of the required information. If the commission determines the registration statement does not contain all of the required information or that an executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest has failed to file a registration statement, the commission shall send written notification of the deficiency by certified mail to the person who filed the registration statement or to the person who failed to file the registration statement regarding the failure. Any person so notified by the commission shall, not later than fifteen (15) days after receiving the notice, file a registration statement or an amended registration statement that includes all of the required information. If any person who receives a notice under this subsection fails to file a registration statement or an amended registration statement within the fifteen (15) day period, the commission may initiate an investigation of the person’s failure to file. If the commission initiates an investigation pursuant to this section, the commission shall also notify each elected executive official and the secretary of each cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

of the pending investigation.

In the biennial report published under KRS 11A.110(13), the commission shall, in the manner and form the commission determines, include a report containing statistical information on the registration statements filed under this section during the preceding biennium.

If an employer who engages an executive agency lobbyist, or a real party in interest on whose behalf the executive agency lobbyist was engaged is the recipient of a contract, grant, lease, or other financial arrangement pursuant to which funds of the state or of an executive agency are distributed or allocated, the executive agency or any aggrieved party may consider the failure of the real party in interest, the employer, or the executive agency lobbyist to comply with this section as a breach of a material condition of the contract, grant, lease, or other financial arrangement.

Executive agency officials may require certification from any person seeking the award of a contract, grant, lease, or financial arrangement that the person, his or her employer, and any real party in interest are in compliance with this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 47, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 172, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 542, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 18, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 162, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 74, § 6, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 127, § 9, effective July 15, 2020.

11A.216.
Statements of expenditures.

Each executive agency lobbyist, employer, and real party in interest shall file with the commission, with the updated registration statement required by KRS 11A.211(2), a statement of expenditures as specified in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. An executive agency lobbyist shall file a separate statement of expenditures under this section for each employer engaging him.

In addition to the information required by paragraph (b) of this subsection, a statement filed by an executive agency lobbyist shall show the total amount of expenditures made by the lobbyist during the reporting period covered by the statement by the executive agency lobbyist.

If, during a fiscal year, the real party in interest, the employer or any executive agency lobbyist he engaged made expenditures to or on behalf of a particular elected executive official, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, a particular executive agency official, or a particular member of the staff of any of those officials, the real party in interest, employer, or executive agency lobbyist also shall state the name of the official or employee on whose behalf the expenditures were made, the total amount of the expenditures made, a brief description of the expenditures made, and the approximate date the expenditures were made.

Expenditures shall be reported on the expenditure statement for the reporting period that includes the date on which the expenditure was made.

In addition to the information required by subsection (2)(b) of this section, a statement filed by a real party in interest or an employer shall show the total amount of expenditures during the period covered by the statement. As used in this subsection, “expenditures” does not include the expenses of maintaining office facilities or support services for executive agency lobbyists.

An employer or real party in interest shall not be required to show any expenditure on a statement filed under this subsection if the expenditure is reported on a statement filed under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section by an executive agency lobbyist engaged by the employer.

Any statement required to be filed under this section shall be filed at the times specified in KRS

11A.211

. Each statement shall cover expenditures made during the prior fiscal year.

If it is impractical or impossible for an executive agency lobbyist, employer, or real party in interest to determine exact dollar amounts or values of expenditures, reporting of good faith estimates, based on reasonable accounting procedures, constitutes compliance with this section.

Executive agency lobbyists, employers, and real parties in interest shall retain receipts or maintain records for all expenditures that are required to be reported pursuant to this section. These receipts or records shall be maintained for a period ending on the thirtieth day of June of the second fiscal year after the year in which the expenditure was made.

At least ten (10) days before the date on which the statement is filed, each employer, executive agency lobbyist, or real party in interest who is required to file an expenditure statement under subsection (2)(b) of this section shall deliver a copy of the statement, or the portion showing the expenditure, to the official or employee who is listed in the statement as having received the expenditure or on whose behalf it was made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 48, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 172, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 542, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

11A.221.
Statements of financial transactions.

Any executive agency lobbyist who has had any financial transaction with, or for the benefit of, an elected executive official, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, an executive agency official, or any member of the staff of any of those officials shall describe the details of the transaction, including the name of the official or employee, the purpose and nature of the transaction, and the date it was made or entered into, in a statement filed with the commission with the updated registration statement required by KRS 11A.211(2). Each statement shall describe each financial transaction that occurred during the prior fiscal year.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, any employer who has had any financial transaction with or for the benefit of an elected executive official, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, an executive agency official, or any member of the staff of any of those officials shall describe the details of the transaction, including the name of the official or employee, the purpose and nature of the transaction, and the date it was made or entered into, in a statement filed with the commission with the updated registration statement required by KRS

11A.211

(2). The statement shall be filed at the times specified in KRS

11A.211

. Each statement shall describe each financial transaction that occurred during the prior fiscal year.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, any real party in interest who has had any financial transaction with or for the benefit of any elected executive official, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, an executive agency official, or any member of the staff of any of those officials shall describe the details of the transaction, including the name of the official or employee, the purpose and nature of the transaction, and the date it was made or entered into, in a statement filed with the commission with the updated registration statement required by KRS

11A.211

(2). The statement shall be filed at the times specified in KRS

11A.211

. Each statement shall describe each financial transaction that occurred during the prior fiscal year.

At least ten (10) days before the date on which the statement is filed, each employer, executive agency lobbyist, or real party in interest who is required to file a statement describing a financial transaction under this section shall deliver a copy of the statement to the official or employee with whom or for whose benefit the transaction was made.

An employer shall not be required to file any statement under this section or to deliver a copy of the statement to an official or employee with whom or for whose benefit the transaction was made if the financial transaction to which the statement pertains is reported by an executive agency lobbyist engaged by the employer.

A real party in interest shall not be required to file any statement under this section or to deliver a copy of the statement to an official or employee with whom or for whose benefit the transaction was made if the financial transaction to which the statement pertains is reported by an executive agency lobbyist who is acting on behalf of the real party in interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 49, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 172, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 542, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

11A.226.
Dispute resolution with respect to statements of expenditures and statements of financial transactions.

If a dispute arises between an elected executive official, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, an executive agency official, or any member of the staff of any of those officials and a real party in interest, an employer, or an executive agency lobbyist with respect to an expenditure or financial transaction alleged in a statement to be filed under KRS

11A.216

or

11A.221

, the official, employee, real party in interest, employer, or executive agency lobbyist may file a complaint with the commission. The commission shall investigate the complaint.

The complaint shall be filed at least three (3) days prior to the time the statement is required to be filed with the commission. The time for filing a disputed expenditure or financial transaction in any statement of expenditures or the details of a financial transaction shall be extended pending the final decision of the commission. This extension does not extend the time for filing the nondisputed portions of either type of statement. The commission shall notify the parties of its final decision by certified mail. If the commission decides the disputed expenditure or financial transaction should be reported, the employer, a real party in interest, or the executive agency lobbyist shall include the matter in an amended statement and file the amended statement not later than ten (10) days after receiving notice of the decision of the commission by certified mail.

An employer, executive agency lobbyist, or real party in interest who files a false statement of expenditures or details of a financial transaction is liable in a civil action to any official or employee who sustains damage as a result of the filing or publication of the statement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 50, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 172, § 6, effective July 15, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

11A.231.
Activities excepted from KRS 11A.211 and 11A.216.

KRS

11A.211

and

11A.216

do not apply to efforts to influence executive agency decisions or conduct executive agency lobbying activity by any of the following:

Appearances at public hearings of the committees or interim committees of the General Assembly, at court proceedings, at rule-making or adjudication proceedings, or at other public meetings;

News, editorial, and advertising statements published in newspapers, journals, or magazines, or broadcast over radio or television;

The gathering and furnishing of information and news by bona fide reporters, correspondents, or news bureaus to news media described in subsection (1)(b) of this section; or

Publications primarily designed for and distributed to members of associations or charitable or fraternal nonprofit corporations.

Nothing in KRS

11A.201

to

11A.246

requires the reporting of, or prohibits an elected executive official from soliciting or accepting, a contribution from or an expenditure by any person if the contribution or expenditure is reported in accordance with KRS Chapter 121.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 51, effective September 16, 1993; 2005, ch. 105, § 15, effective March 16, 2005.

11A.233.
Influencing decision on award of economic incentive package — Disclosure statement by beneficiary.

For purposes of KRS

11A.201

to

11A.246

, the term “executive agency lobbyist” does not include a person acting to promote, oppose, or otherwise influence the outcome of a decision of the Cabinet for Economic Development or any board or authority within or attached to that cabinet relating to the issuance or award of a bond, grant, lease, loan, assessment, incentive, inducement, or tax credit pursuant to KRS

42.4588

,

103.210

, Chapter 154, or Chapter 224A, or otherwise relating to any other component of an economic incentive package.

Notwithstanding subsection (1), before any board or authority within or attached to the Cabinet for Economic Development takes final action on any contract or agreement by which any bond, grant, lease, loan, assessment, incentive, inducement, or tax credit is awarded, the beneficiary of an economic incentive package shall file with the approving board or authority a disclosure statement which shall contain:

The identity of the beneficiary of an economic incentive package and any person employed to act on its behalf in its dealings with the Cabinet for Economic Development or any board or authority within or attached to that cabinet regarding the matters to which the contract or agreement refers; and

The details of any financial transaction as defined in KRS 11A.201(6) (a) between the beneficiary or any other person listed as an employee or agent of the beneficiary as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection and any agent or public servant of the Cabinet for Economic Development, any member of any board or authority within or attached to that cabinet, or any other public servant involved in the negotiation of the economic incentive package.

After final action by the board or authority, the Cabinet for Economic Development shall file the disclosure statement described in subsection (2) of this section with the Executive Branch Ethics Commission, but the cabinet may delete information identifying the beneficiary of the economic-incentive package if the cabinet believes that identification would damage economic development.

No beneficiary of an economic incentive package as referred to in this section shall engage any person to influence decisions of the Cabinet for Economic Development or the approving board or authority for compensation that is contingent in any way on the outcome of the decisions of the cabinet or the approving board or authority regarding contracts or agreements specified in subsection (2) of this section, and no person shall accept any engagement to influence these decisions or conduct lobbying activities related to these decisions for compensation that is contingent in any way on the outcome of the decisions of the cabinet or the approving board or authority regarding these contracts or agreements.

Subsection (4) of this section does not prohibit, and shall not be construed to prohibit, any person from compensating that person’s sales employees pursuant to any incentive compensation plan, such as commission sales, if the incentive compensation plan is the same plan used to compensate similarly-situated sales employees who are not engaged by the beneficiary of an economic incentive package in activities and functions referred to in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 450, § 37, effective July 15, 1994; 2020 ch. 127, § 10, effective July 15, 2020.

11A.236.
Prohibition against lobbying on a contingency basis — Exception for incentive compensation plans and placement agents.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person shall engage any persons to influence executive agency decisions or conduct executive agency lobbying activity for compensation that is contingent in any way on the outcome of an executive agency decision, including payment based on the awarding of a contract or payment of a percentage of a government contract awarded, and no person shall accept any engagement to influence executive agency decisions or conduct executive agency lobbying activity for compensation that is contingent in any way on the outcome of an executive agency decision, including payment based on the awarding of a contract or payment of a percentage of a government contract awarded. An employer who pays an executive agency lobbyist based on the awarding of a contract or payment of a percentage of a government contract awarded shall be barred from doing business with the Commonwealth for a period of five (5) years from the date on which such a payment is revealed to the Executive Branch Ethics Commission.

Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit, and shall not be construed to prohibit:

Any person from compensating his or her sales employees pursuant to an incentive compensation plan, such as commission sales, if the incentive compensation plan is the same plan used to compensate similarly situated sales employees who are not executive agency lobbyists; or

Any person from engaging a placement agent to influence investment decisions of the Kentucky Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, and the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System for compensation that is contingent on the outcome of investment decisions by the retirement systems’ boards of trustees. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to unregulated placement agents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 52, effective September 16, 1993; 2012, ch. 75, § 3, effective April 11, 2012; 2019 ch. 74, § 7, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 79, § 13, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/11/2012). The phrase “board of trustees” in subsection (2)(b) of this statute has been changed in codification to “boards of trustees.” This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS 7.136(1).

11A.241.
Commission’s duties with respect to executive agency lobbying.

The commission shall keep on file the statements required by KRS

11A.211

,

11A.216

, and

11A.221

. These statements are public records and open to public inspection, and the commission shall computerize them so the information contained in them is readily accessible to the general public. The commission shall provide copies of the statements to the public on request and may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed the cost of copying and delivering the statement.

Not later than the last day of August of each year, the commission shall compile from the registration statements filed with it a complete and updated list of registered executive agency lobbyists and their employers, and real parties in interest and distribute the list to each elected executive branch official and the secretary of each cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, who shall distribute the list to the appropriate personnel under their jurisdiction. The commission shall provide copies of the list to the public upon request and may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed the cost of copying and delivering the list.

The commission shall maintain a list of all executive agency lobbyists. The commission shall provide copies of the list to the public on request and may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed the cost of copying and delivering the document.

The commission shall prescribe and make available an appropriate form for the filings required by KRS

11A.211

,

11A.216

, and

11A.221

. The form shall contain the following notice in boldface type: “ANY PERSON WHO KNOWINGLY FILES A FALSE STATEMENT IS IN VIOLATION OF STATE LAW AND SUBJECT TO FINES AND OTHER PENALTIES.”

Any rules adopted by the commission to implement KRS

11A.201

to

11A.246

shall be adopted by administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The commission shall publish a handbook that explains in clear and concise language the provisions of KRS

11A.201

to

11A.246

and make it available free of charge to executive agency lobbyists, employers, real parties in interest, and any other interested persons.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 53, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 172, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 542, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

11A.246.
Authorization for compliance investigations by Attorney General and his designees.

The Attorney General and any assistant or special counsel designated by him may investigate compliance with KRS

11A.201

to

11A.246

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 54, effective September 16, 1993.